Vermont, session 2025-2026, H619.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5822a is added to read:
§ 5822a. PERSONAL INCOME TAX SURCHARGE
There shall be a surcharge of three percent of federal adjusted gross income
for individuals with federal adjusted gross income equal to or greater than
$1,000,000.00. The surcharge shall be in addition to any tax assessed under
this chapter and shall be paid, collected, and enforced in the same manner as
the tax assessed under section 5822 of this title. Annually, the Commissioner
of Taxes shall use the process required under subdivision 5822(b)(2) of this
title to adjust for inflation the minimum amount of federal adjusted gross
income necessary for an individual to incur this surcharge.
VT LEG #386148 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.619
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable years on and after January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386148 v.1